Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 1. Applications

§ 12-4-101.
Authority of cities, towns and counties; population figures; number of available licenses and permits; assessment of fees.

Incorporated cities, towns and counties within Wyoming shall license and regulate or prohibit the retail sale of alcoholic and malt beverages under this title. Nothing in this title prohibits a licensing authority of an incorporated city, town or county from issuing less than the total number of allowable liquor licenses or from refusing to issue any license or permit authorized by this title.

Population figures are based upon the official ten (10) year federal census preceding the time of application. Population figures based upon the official census shall be periodically revised by a state population estimate no later than five (5) years after the federal census publication date.

Population figures and estimates required by subsection (b) of this section shall be furnished to the appropriate licensing authorities within the state by the department of administration and information using population estimates from the United States bureau of the census. The maximum number of licenses and permits available for issuance by a licensing authority pursuant to the population formula provided by W.S.

12-4-201

and

12-4-413

, shall be certified and distributed by the division.

Unless otherwise provided, the licensing authority shall uniformly assess license or permit fees annually for each particular class of license or permit.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 53-203; Laws 1951, ch. 22, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 12-6; Laws 1959, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

12-2-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 2006, ch. 106, § 2; 2009, ch. 170, § 1; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “less than the allowable bar and grill liquor licenses pursuant to W.S.

12-4-413

” in (a); and inserted “and

12-4-413

” in (c).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “using population estimates from the United States bureau of the census” at the end of the first sentence in (c).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” at the end of (c).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, deleted the last sentence of (d), which read: “Applicants for a license or permit shall pay the required fee in cash or by certified check upon receipt of the license or permit.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence of (a), deleted "retail" following "allowable" and deleted "pursuant to W.S. 12 4 201, less than the allowable bar and grill liquor licenses pursuant to W.S.

12-4-413

" following "liquor licenses."

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 3, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “(a)
No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b)
No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Population-determined, liquor license eligibility provisions constitutional. —

Subsection (b), providing for population adjustment of liquor license numbers on a state agency estimate, is not unconstitutional, since the legislature can use any rational process chosen as a basis to authorize population-determined liquor license eligibility of municipalities and counties. State ex rel. Stocker v. Laramie, 737 P.2d 746,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 451

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Interplay between Twenty-First Amendment and Commerce Clause concerning state regulation of intoxicating liquors, 116 ALR5th 149.

§ 12-4-102.
Application for licenses and permits; contents; signature and verification.

Any person desiring a license or permit authorized by this title shall apply to the appropriate licensing authority. The application shall be made under oath upon a form to be prepared by the attorney general and furnished to the licensing authority. The application shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the appropriate licensing authority and shall contain the following provisions:

The location of the licensed building in which the applicant will sell under the license if the building is in existence at the time of application. If the building is not in existence, the location and an architect’s drawing or suitable plans of the licensed building and premises to be licensed;

The age and residence of the applicant, and of each applicant or partner if the application is made by more than one (1) individual or by a partnership;

A disclosure of any criminal record of the applicant or any partner equal to a felony conviction under Wyoming law and of any conviction for a violation of Wyoming law relating to the sale or manufacture of alcoholic liquor or malt beverages within ten (10) years prior to the filing of the application;

If the applicant is a corporation:

The name, age and residence of each officer, director and stockholder holding, either jointly or severally, ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding and issued capital stock of the corporation; and

Whether any officer, director or stockholder with ten percent (10%) or more ownership has been convicted of a violation of law as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection.

If the applicant is a limited liability company:

The name, age and residence of each officer, manager and member holding, either jointly or severally, ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding ownership of the limited liability company; and

If any officer, manager or member with ten percent (10%) or more ownership has been convicted of a violation of law as provided under paragraph (a)(iii) of this subsection.

A statement indicating the financial condition and financial stability of a new applicant;

and (vii) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 22, § 3.

No person or partner shall have any interest, directly or indirectly, in a license or permit unless he signs and verifies the application for the license or permit. No corporation shall be granted a license or permit unless two (2) or more of the officers or directors sign and verify the application on behalf of the corporation and also verify upon their oath as individuals that the statements and provisions contained therein are true, except that if all the stock of the corporation is owned by one (1) individual then that individual may sign and verify the application and verify upon his oath that the statements and provisions contained therein are true. No limited liability company shall be granted a license or permit unless at least one (1) of the officers, managers, or if there are no officers or managers, at least one (1) of the members who is duly authorized to act on behalf of the limited liability company signs and verifies the application on behalf of the company and also verifies upon his oath that the statements and provisions contained therein are true.

Corporate and limited liability company licensees and permittees shall advise the licensing authority within thirty (30) days in writing of any change in the information in the application required by paragraph (a)(iv) or (v) of this section. The licensing authority shall provide the division a copy of a notification of change.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 4; 1945, ch. 133, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 53-204; W.S. 1957, § 12-9(a), (b); Laws 1961, ch. 172, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

12-2-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 1981, ch. 24, § 1; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 1996, ch. 122, § 2; 1999, ch. 179, § 1; 2007, ch. 54, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

in (b), inserted the exception, twice substituted “at least one (1)” for “two (2) or more,” inserted “who is duly authorized to act on behalf of the limited liability company” following “members,” and made related and stylistic changes.

Laws 2007, ch. 54, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 16, 2007.

The 2011 amendment,

in (a)(iii), deleted “and” at the end.

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” in (c).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i), deleted “and a description” following “The location,” and substituted “licensed building” for “room” twice.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, repealed (a)(vii), which read, "The site and the zoning of the site where the applicant will sell under the license"; and repealed (a)(viii), which read, "If application is for a retail license renewal, the applicant shall provide documentation to the local licensing authority that minimum purchase requirements specified in W.S. 12-4-103(c) have been met."

Quoted

in

New Hampshire Fire Ins. Co. v. Boler, 55 Wyo. 530, 102 P.2d 39,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1940); City of Evanston v. Whirl Inn, Inc., 647 P.2d 1378,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1982); Kurpjuweit v. Northwestern Dev. Co., 708 P.2d 39,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 584

(Wyo. 1985).

Stated

in

Scranton v. Whitlock, 389 P.2d 1015,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1964).

Cited

in

Dubray v. Howshar, 884 P.2d 23,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1994); State ex rel. Bayou Liquors, Inc. v. City of Casper, 906 P.2d 1046,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to withdraw application to procure or to transfer liquor license, 73 ALR2d 1223.

§ 12-4-103.
Restrictions upon license or permit applicants and holders; license limitation per person.

A license or permit authorized by this title shall not be held by, issued or transferred to:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 50, § 2.

Any person who does not own the building or hold a written lease for the period for which the license will be effective containing an agreement by the lessor that alcoholic or malt beverages may be sold upon the leased premises, except as provided by paragraph (iv) of this subsection. This paragraph shall not be interpreted to prevent the use of a resort liquor license by a contractor or subcontractor as permitted by W.S. 12-4-403(b);

Any licensee who fails to demonstrate that his licensed alcoholic or malt beverage enterprise will be operational in a planned but not physically functional building within one (1) year after a license or permit has been issued or transferred, or if holding a license, fails to open his business in a functional building within one (1) year after license issuance or transfer and remain operational thereafter. Upon a showing of good cause by the licensee and for an additional period of not to exceed one (1) year, the local licensing authority may extend the time period in which the business or enterprise of the licensee is required to become operational or open for business pursuant to this paragraph. Any license or permit in violation of this paragraph shall not be renewed by the local licensing authority and once the enterprise is operational or open for business, no licensee shall be eligible to repeat the grace periods made available by this paragraph without the consent of the local licensing authority due to extraordinary circumstances. For purposes of this paragraph “remain operational” means operational consecutively, in any license term year, for twelve (12) months or for not less than three (3) months if determined by the local licensing authority to be a seasonal operation;

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 122, § 3.

A manufacturer of alcoholic beverages or wholesaler of malt beverages, except as authorized under W.S. 12-2-203(g) or as otherwise provided by law;

A person under eighteen (18) years of age;

A college fraternity or organization created by one (1) or more college fraternities;

A chamber of commerce, except for twenty-four (24) hour malt beverage permits issued pursuant to W.S.

12-4-502

;

A corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, or limited liability partnership which has not qualified to do business in Wyoming;

An individual who is not a resident; or

Any general partnership or group of two (2) or more persons unless each person interested, directly or indirectly, is a resident or qualified to do business in this state.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 22, § 3.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 4; 1945, ch. 133, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 53-204; W.S. 1957, § 12-9(c); Laws 1961, ch. 172, § 2; 1973, ch. 213, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

12-2-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, §§ 2, 3; 1988, ch. 44, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 1996, ch. 122, §§ 2, 3; 1999, ch. 129, § 1; ch. 179, § 1; 2004, ch. 58, § 1; 2009, ch. 42, § 1; 2015 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 50, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 162, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 126, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 22, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(ix), added the exception at the end.

Laws 2004, ch. 58, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “Except as provided in W.S. 12-4-301(e)” at the beginning of (b).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(iii), added the last sentence, and made a related change.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” in (c).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (c), deleted “license or permit authorized by this title shall not be renewed if the licensee or permittee did not, during the previous one (1) year term of the license or permit, purchase at least five hundred dollars ($500.00) of alcoholic or malt beverages or a combination thereof from the division or any authorized malt beverage wholesaler” following “of this section,” and made a related change.

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 50, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (a)(i) and (ii), which read, “(i) Any mayor, member of a city or town council or county commissioner within their respective jurisdiction; (ii) Any person employed by the state or a city, town or county as a law enforcement officer or who holds office as a law enforcement officer through election.”

The third
2017 amendment, by ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(iii), deleted “in which the sales room is located” following “own the building.”

The fourth
2017 amendment, by ch. 162, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(iv) substituted “one (1) year” for “two (2) years” twice in the first sentence, added “and remain operational thereafter” at the end of the first sentence, and added the current end of the last sentence which reads: “and once the enterprise is operational or open for business, no licensee shall be eligible to repeat the grace periods made available by this paragraph without the consent of the local licensing authority due to extraordinary circumstances. For purposes of this paragraph “remain operational” means operational consecutively, in any license term year, for twelve (12) months or for not less than three (3) months if determined by the local licensing authority to be a seasonal operation.”

While no amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(vi), added “except as authorized under W.S. 12-2-203(g).”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(vi), added “except as provided in W.S. 12-4-412(j)” at the end.

The third 2019 amendment, by ch. 126, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(vi), added “except as authorized under W.S. 12-2-203(g).”

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, in (a)(vi), added "otherwise" and substituted "by law" for "in W.S. 12-4-412(j)."

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021,
in (a)(vi), repealed (b), which read, "Except as provided in W.S. 12-4-301(e), no licensing authority shall issue more than one (1) license or permit to any one (1) person"; repealed (c), which read, "Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, a retail liquor license shall not be renewed if the licensee did not, during the previous one (1) year term of the license, purchase at least two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) of alcoholic or malt beverages or a combination thereof from the division or any authorized malt beverage wholesaler"; and repealed (d), which read, "Subsection (c) of this section shall not apply to:

Any licensee or permittee having a planned but not physically functional building pursuant to paragraph (a)(iv) of this section;

Holders of special permits issued under article 5 of this chapter;

Holders of a limited transportation liquor license under W.S.

12-2-202

."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Wholesale license will not be issued to liquor retailer.

Lamp Liquors, Inc. v. Adolph Coors Co., 410 F. Supp. 536, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 15751 (D. Wyo. 1976).

Applied

in

Hill v. Hamilton, 368 P.2d 957,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1962).

Cited

in

Johnson v. State Hearing Exmrs. Office, 838 P.2d 158,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1992); State ex rel. Bayou Liquors, Inc. v. City of Casper, 906 P.2d 1046,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 12-4-104.
Publication of notice; grant or denial; renewal preference; copy of application and notice to division; judicial review.

When an application for a license, permit, renewal or any transfer of location or ownership thereof has been filed with a licensing authority, the clerk shall promptly prepare a notice of application and publish the notice in a newspaper of local circulation once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks. When a county is the licensing authority, the county clerk shall also post the notice on the official website of the county in the manner provided in W.S 18-3-516(f). When a city or town is the licensing authority, the city clerk shall also post the notice on the city or town’s official website if one exists. The notice shall state that a named applicant has applied for a license, permit, renewal or transfer thereof, and that protests against the issuance, renewal or transfer of the license or permit will be heard at a designated meeting of the licensing authority. Each applicant shall, at the time of filing his application, pay the clerk an amount sufficient to cover the costs of publishing notice. Notices may be substantially in the following form:

NOTICE OF APPLICATION FOR A Notice is hereby given that on the day of (year) (name of applicant) filed an application for a license (permit), in the office of the clerk of the city (or town or county) of for the following building (insert address) and protests, if any there be, against the issuance (transfer or renewal) of the license (permit) will be heard at the hour of M., on the day of (year), in the (meeting place of the governing body). Dated
Signed

Click to view

Any license or permit authorized under this title shall not be issued, renewed or transferred until on or after the date set in the notice for hearing protests. If a renewal or transfer hearing, the hearing shall be held no later than thirty (30) days preceding the expiration date of the license or permit. A license or permit shall not be issued, renewed or transferred if the licensing authority finds from evidence presented at the hearing:

The welfare of the people residing in the vicinity of the proposed license or permit premises shall be adversely and seriously affected;

The purpose of this title shall not be carried out by the issuance, renewal or transfer of the license or permit;

The number, type and location of existing licenses or permits meet the needs of the vicinity under consideration;

The desires of the residents of the county, city or town will not be met or satisfied by the issuance, renewal or transfer of the license or permit; or

Any other reasonable restrictions or standards which may be imposed by the licensing authority shall not be carried out by the issuance, renewal or transfer of the license or permit.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 50, § 2.

When any application is filed with a licensing authority, the licensing authority shall immediately forward a copy of the application to the division. No licensing authority shall approve or deny an application until the division has certified the application is complete pursuant to this subsection. All applications shall be deemed to be certified unless objection is made by the division within ten (10) working days after receipt of the application. Upon approval or denial of an application, the licensing authority shall promptly notify the division.

An applicant for a renewal license or permit may appeal to the district court from an adverse decision by the licensing authority. No applicant for a new license shall have a right of appeal from the decision of the licensing authority denying an application.

Upon an appeal the person applying for renewal of a license shall be named as plaintiff, with the licensing authority named as defendant. During the pendency of an appeal, a renewal license denied by a licensing authority shall not be granted to any other applicant. Upon notice of appeal the clerk shall transmit to the clerk of the district court a certified copy of the application, of each protest if any, and of the minutes recording the decision appealed from. The appeal shall be heard as a trial de novo with evidence taken and other proceedings had as in the trial of civil actions. The court may accept and consider as part of the record certified documents forwarded to the court by the clerk of the licensing authority. The case shall be heard promptly and the procedure shall conform to the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure unless other procedures are provided for or required.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 5; 1945, ch. 133, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 53-205; W.S. 1957, § 12-11; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-108; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 1996, ch. 122, § 2; 1999, ch. 150, § 2; 2014 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 50, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a), substituted “two (2) consecutive weeks” for “four (4) consecutive weeks” in the first sentence and added the present second sentence.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” in (d).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, repealed former (c), which read: “The owner and holder of an expired liquor license or permit or one due for expiration has a preference right to a new license for the same location. After the required notice and a public hearing, each application claiming renewal preference shall be promptly considered and acted upon by the licensing authority.”

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in the application form in (a), substituted “building” for “described place (and room),” and substituted “address” for “description.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted ", place the notice conspicuously upon the premises shown by the application as the proposed place of sale" in the first sentence of (a); in the first sentence of (f), added "renewal of" and deleted "and claiming renewal preference" preceding "shall be named."

Federal tax lien can attach to a liquor license.

United States v. Skirko, 631 F. Supp. 790, 1985 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12775 (D. Wyo. 1985), rev'd, 878 F.2d 340, 1989 U.S. App. LEXIS 9058 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1989).

Lien expires at end of license's term. —

A federal tax lien imposed upon a local liquor license expired with the end of the term of the license issued to the taxpayer. Sterner v. United States, 774 P.2d 639,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1989).

Valuable rights inherent in liquor license. —

One of the valuable rights inherent in a liquor license is the “first chance” or opportunity to apply to the licensing authority for continuation or renewal of the license. United States v. Skirko, 631 F. Supp. 790, 1985 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12775 (D. Wyo. 1985), rev'd, 878 F.2d 340, 1989 U.S. App. LEXIS 9058 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1989).

License holder's privilege is not irrevocably vested

but is only a privilege. City of Evanston v. Whirl Inn, 647 P.2d 1378,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1982).

A licensee who meets the statutory requirements for licensure has the right to expect that the license would be renewed. However, the licensing authority may refuse to renew, in the presence of proper facts and proceedings, because the license holder's privilege is not irrevocably vested but it is only a privilege. Sterner v. United States, 774 P.2d 639,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1989).

Due process is not involved in hearing on application

for issuance of a liquor license, since whatever rights an applicant for a liquor license may have depend entirely upon the statute regulating the issuance of liquor licenses. Whitesides v. Council of Cheyenne, 78 Wyo. 80, 319 P.2d 520,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1957).

No denial of equal protection. —

It is not a denial of equal protection to permit a person already engaged in the sale of intoxicating liquors to continue to do so while denying the initial application of another, for the former has a vested right while the latter has a mere hope or expectation of embarking upon the same calling at some future date. Berry v. Arapahoe & Shoshone Tribes, 420 F. Supp. 934, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12845 (D. Wyo. 1976).

No denial of due process. —

Unpublished decision:

Delay in renewal of a bar's liquor license did not violate the due process rights of plaintiffs, the bar owner and its principals; plaintiffs had no protected property interest under Wyoming law in the continuation of the license, and the delay was due in part to the requirement under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

12-4-104

that protests against renewal be heard. Also, the license never lapsed and was never revoked.
Rocky Mt. Rogues, Inc. v. Town of Alpine, 375 Fed. Appx. 887,

2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 7998

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2010).

Right of appeal limited to application for renewal. —

The legislature has seen fit not to grant the right of appeal when an applicant wants an original license which is denied. It is limited to those applying for a renewal. Whitesides v. Council of Cheyenne, 78 Wyo. 80, 319 P.2d 520,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1957).

When this section speaks of the renewal of a license, it speaks of one which contains the same terms and conditions as the old license, namely, one which permits the sale of intoxicating liquor at the same place as permitted in the old license. It is the denial of that kind of license from which an appeal may be taken to the district court and not from the denial of another kind. Whitesides v. Council of Cheyenne, 78 Wyo. 80, 319 P.2d 520,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1957).

Burden of proof on applicant. —

The burden of proof is upon the applicant for renewal of a liquor license to show that refusal of city council to grant the application was arbitrary or capricious. Whitesides v. Council of Cheyenne, 78 Wyo. 80, 319 P.2d 520,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1957).

Denial of liquor license application incontestable. —

Inasmuch as the right to a judicial review of the denial of an application for a liquor license is specifically and positively forbidden by statute, an applicant cannot contest such a denial. Walker v. Board of County Comm'rs, 644 P.2d 772,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 336

(Wyo. 1982).

Applicant normally precluded from contesting issuance of denied license to another. —

Although subsection (e) denies the right of appeal to an applicant for a new license only from a decision denying his own application, the status in which such an applicant places himself by the application will normally preclude him from the standing to contest the issuance to another of the license for which he applied. Walker v. Board of County Comm'rs, 644 P.2d 772,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 336

(Wyo. 1982).

Right to hearing and review pertaining to issuance or renewal of liquor license exists only:

(1) to those people and residents referred to in paragraphs (i) and (iv) of subsection (b) for the purposes there set forth; and (2) to matters involving the revocation or suspension of such licenses by the Wyoming liquor commission pursuant to § 12-7-201(d). Walker v. Board of County Comm'rs, 644 P.2d 772,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 336

(Wyo. 1982).

Liquor licensee may challenge issuance of license. —

An owner of a retail liquor license can be a “resident” and consequently have standing under
Walker v. Board of County Comm'rs, 644 P.2d 772,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 336

(Wyo. 1982) and subsection (b)(iv) to challenge the issuance or renewal of a retail liquor license in the same manner as any other resident of the county, city or town. State ex rel. Bayou Liquors v. City of Casper, 906 P.2d 1046,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1995).

Subsection (f) governs judicial review of liquor-licensing decisions by cities and towns. —

Judicial review of liquor-licensing decisions by the governing bodies of cities and towns, as opposed to those by counties, is no longer governed by the Administrative Procedure Act, but by subsection (f) and its trial de novo provision. City of Evanston v. Whirl Inn, 647 P.2d 1378,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1982).

Issues for consideration when appeal from agency is heard as trial de novo. —

When an appeal from an administrative agency is heard as a trial de novo in district court, the only issues that court may properly consider are whether the agency illegally or arbitrarily exercised its discretion and whether the agency's action was procured by fraud. City of Evanston v. Whirl Inn, 647 P.2d 1378,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1982).

Review not limited to agency's record. —

When a trial de novo is provided, the reviewing court is not limited to the record before the agency. City of Evanston v. Whirl Inn, 647 P.2d 1378,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1982).

Applied

in

Glenn v. Board of County Comm'rs, 440 P.2d 1,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1968); Naibauer v. Board of Platte County Comm'rs, 895 P.2d 445,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Hill v. Hamilton, 368 P.2d 957,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1962); Gladstone Hotel, Inc. v. Smith, 487 P.2d 329,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. 1971).

Law reviews. —

For article “Scope of Review of Decision of an Administrative Agency in Wyoming,” see IX Wyo. L.J. 65.

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Grant or renewal of liquor license as affected by the fact that applicants held such license in the past, 2 ALR2d 1239.

§ 12-4-105.
Disposition of license fees; refunds prohibited.

All fees for licenses and permits issued by a licensing authority paid under this title shall be deposited into the treasury of the licensing authority. No refund of all or any part of a license fee shall be made at any time following issuance.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, §§ 8, 11; 1941, ch. 90, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 53-208, 53-211; Laws 1949, ch. 136, § 2; 1955, ch. 228, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 12-13, 12-15; W.S. 1977, §§ 12-2-110, 12-2-112; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2.

§ 12-4-106.
Term of license and permit; exception.

A license or permit is considered a personal privilege to the holder and the term of the license or permit is for one (1) year unless sooner revoked. When a valid license or permit is determined to be part of the estate of a deceased holder, the administrator or executor of the estate may exercise the privilege of the deceased under the license or permit until the expiration of the license or permit.

The term of a license or permit may be less than one (1) year if specified by the licensing authority to coincide with the annual date or dates set by the authority for consideration of license and permit issuance, renewals and transfers. A licensing authority issuing a license or permit for a term less than one (1) year shall pro-rate the annual fee accordingly. Any licensee not attempting to renew a newly issued pro-rated license or permit valid for one (1) year shall not be eligible for any license or permit authorized under this title for a period of two (2) years after the expiration date of the pro-rated license or permit.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 1.